District of Columbia statutes.
1-607.04

Employee selection procedures — Statement of purpose.

The Council believes that properly validated and standardized employee selection procedures can significantly contribute to the implementation of nondiscriminatory personnel policies, as required by this subchapter. It is also recognized that professionally developed tests, when used in conjunction with other tools of personnel assessment and complemented by sound programs of job design, may aid significantly in the development and maintenance of an efficient work force and in the utilization and conservation of human resources.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 704, 25 DCR 5740

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-607.4.
1973 Ed., § 1-337.4.